Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1636
Sections not applicable to school district; exception.

Sections 71-1626 to 71-1636 do not apply to any school district in the State of Nebraska, except that any school district, upon application to a county, district, or city-county health department formed under such sections, may accept in whole or in part any of the provisions of such sections, by entering into an agreement for that purpose with such health department.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 11, p. 560;

R.S.1943, § 71-1636;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 65.